Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 19. Grading and Certification of Fruits and Nuts.

§ 69-7-751.
Legislative declaration and intent.

The Legislature declares a need to promote Mississippi agricultural products to raise the overall quality of fruits, vegetables and nuts; and it is the intent of the Legislature that fruits, vegetables and nuts produced or processed, or both, in the State of Mississippi be certified and graded.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 605, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 69-7-753.
Food Products Certification Office; creation; establishment; and responsibilities.

There is created in the Department of Agriculture and Commerce a Food Products Certification Office. This office shall establish grading and certification processes for fruits, vegetables and nuts. This office shall also establish regulations and procedures to determine whether a product is produced or processed, or both, in Mississippi. The Food Products Certification Office shall be responsible for:

Inspecting, grading and certifying fruits, vegetables and nuts;

Coordinating and developing markets for Mississippi farmers who produce fruits, vegetables and nuts;

Managing or assisting in the management of the vegetable marketing sheds; and

Assisting farmers in the production of fruits and vegetables with the greatest market demand that are most adaptable to each production area.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 605, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 69-7-755.
Hiring of marketing managers; qualifications and salaries; Producer Advisory Board.

The Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall hire not more than seven (7) marketing managers. The qualifications and salaries for the marketing managers shall be established by the State Personnel Board. Marketing managers shall be employed from a list of applicants approved by the State Personnel Board and recommended by the Director of the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service, the Executive Director of the Agribusiness Council and the Commissioner of Agriculture, or their designees. Marketing managers shall be assigned to one or more of the marketing sheds at Booneville, Louisville, Wiggins, Bassfield, Taylorsville, Newton, Kemper County and Leakesville. Each of these marketing sheds shall be provided with a digital weighing scale to ensure accurate weight/grade. Each marketing shed shall establish a Producer Advisory Board consisting of four (4) local farmer producers of nuts, fruits or vegetables and three (3) produce industry representatives.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 605, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1994.